Wisconsin, session 2025, AB207.
do enact as follows:AB207,11Section 1. 5.35 (6) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB207,2,625.35 (6) (a) 1. The relevant portions of the voting instructions in the type B 3notice for the election as specified in s. 10.02 (3) and, for each referendum on the 4ballot, the text of the type C notice specified in s. 10.01 (2) (c), including the 5complete state referendum disclosure notice prepared under s. 13.175 (2) for each 6statewide referendum.AB207,27Section 2. 10.01 (2) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB207,3,14810.01 (2) (c) Type C — The type C notice shall be entitled “Notice of 1Referendum”. The notice shall be given whenever a referendum is held. The notice 2shall contain the complete state referendum disclosure notice prepared under s. 313.175 (2) for each statewide referendum and, for each local referendum, the date of 4the referendum, the entire text of the question and the proposed enactment, if any, 5as well as an explanatory statement of the effect of either a “yes” or “no” vote. For 6state questions, the statement shall be prepared by the attorney general. For 7county questions, the statement shall be prepared by the corporation counsel. For 8other questions, the statement shall be prepared by the attorney for the jurisdiction 9in which the question is submitted. County clerks and, for questions submitted by 10municipalities or special purpose districts, the clerk of the municipality or special 11purpose district shall publish the type C notice once at the same time that the type 12B notice is published. The type C notice shall be printed in the newspaper as close 13as possible to that portion of the type B notice showing the facsimile referendum 14ballot.AB207,315Section 3. 13.175 of the statutes is renumbered 13.175 (1) and amended to 16read:AB207,4,31713.175 (1) Every proposal for legislation which is to be submitted to the voters 18for their approval or for an expression of their opinion including, without limitation 19because of enumeration, proposed constitutional amendments, advisory referenda, 20and legislation designed to become effective only after ratification by the voters 21shall include a complete statement of the referendum question upon which the 22voters shall be requested to vote in the form prescribed under s. 5.64 (2) and a 23complete state referendum disclosure notice in the form prescribed under sub. (2) 24(a). No such proposal shall be passed by either house of the legislature unless it 1contains the precise wording of the referendum question which is to be submitted to 2the voters for their approval, expression of opinion, or ratification and the precise 3wording of the complete state referendum disclosure notice.AB207,44Section 4. 13.175 (2) of the statutes is created to read:AB207,4,6513.175 (2) (a) The complete state referendum disclosure notice shall include 6all of the following:AB207,4,771. The date of the referendum.AB207,4,982. The entire text of the ballot question and proposed constitutional 9amendment or enactment, if any.AB207,4,10103. To the extent applicable, a plain language summary of current law.AB207,4,12114. An explanation in plain language of the effect of the proposed constitutional 12amendment or other statewide referendum.AB207,4,14135. An explanation in plain language of the effect of a “yes” vote and the effect 14of a “no” vote.AB207,4,1715(b) The content of the complete state referendum disclosure notice included 16under par. (a) 3., 4., and 5. combined may not exceed one page on paper not less than 178 1/2 inches by 11 inches and printed in at least 12-point font.AB207,4,2018(c) 1. The complete state referendum disclosure notice shall be posted with 19sample ballots for each statewide referendum at the same time and in the same 20manner in which the sample ballots are posted for public inspection.AB207,5,2212. For at least 30 days prior to the date of a statewide referendum, the 22complete state referendum disclosure notice shall be published by the elections 23commission on the Internet site that is used by voters for original registration 24under s. 6.30 (5) or other voter public access website maintained by the elections 1commission and shall be posted by each county clerk at the county clerk’s office and 2published by the county clerk on the county clerk’s website.AB207,5,533. The complete state referendum disclosure notice shall be included with 4each official absentee ballot provided to a voter for purposes of voting in a statewide 5referendum.AB207,5,66